Indiana, session 2026, HB1365.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) As used in this SECTION, "budget committee" refers to the
budget committee established by IC 4-12-1-3(b).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "office of the secretary" refers to
the office of the secretary of family and social services established
by IC 12-8-1.5-1.
(c) Not later than March 1, 2026, the office of the secretary shall
submit a written report to the budget committee that includes all
information relating to the cost, analysis, reasoning, and decision
for the termination of any Medicaid contract with a managed care
organization that served at least two hundred thousand (200,000)
Medicaid recipients during the 2025 calendar year. The report
must include the following supporting documentation:
(1) Any electronic mail, including internal and external mail,
related to the analysis and decision to terminate a contract.
(2) Any memoranda related to the analysis and decision to
terminate a contract.
(3) Any performance related data concerning the managed
2026 IN 1365—LS 6360/DI 104


care organization's contract.
(4) Any cost related analysis of services provided under the
contract and costs related to the termination of the contract.
(d) This SECTION expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1365—LS 6360/DI 104